Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1026.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1852XC (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 284.4, subsection 1, paragraph b, 1 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 2 follows: 3 Create a teacher quality committee. The committee shall 4 have equal representation of administrators and teachers. 5 The teacher members shall be appointed by the certified 6 employee organization if one exists, and if not, by the school 7 districtâs or agencyâs administration. The administrator 8 members shall be appointed by the school board. However, if a 9 school district can demonstrate that an existing professional 10 development, curriculum, or student improvement committee has 11 significant stakeholder involvement and a leadership role in 12 the school district, the appointing authorities may mutually 13 agree to assign to the existing committee the responsibilities 14 set forth in this paragraph âbâ , to appoint members of the 15 existing committee to the teacher quality committee, or to 16 authorize the existing committee to serve in an advisory 17 capacity to the teacher quality committee. The committee shall 18 do all of the following: 19